Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.752

[Art. 109] Property other than military property—Waste, spoilage, or destruction.

Any person subject to this code who willfully or recklessly wastes, spoils, or otherwise willfully and wrongfully destroys or damages any property other than military property of the United States or of the state shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

[ 2009 c 378 s 23; 1963 c 220 s 107.]